District of Columbia statutes.
42-2001

Short title.

This subchapter, including its table of contents, may be cited as the “Horizontal Property Act of the District of Columbia.”

Dec. 21, 1963, 77 Stat. 449, Pub. L. 88-218, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 45-1701.
1973 Ed., § 5-901.

Prior Codifications

Supersedure of chapter: The provisions of this chapter have been superseded by the provisions of Chapter 19 of this title. See § 42-1901.01(c).

Editor's Notes